Utah statutes.
41-1a-228.   Special lifetime trailer registration -- Property tax or in
lieu fees.
(1)  The owner of a trailer or semitrailer used as a commercial vehicle may
obtain an alternative special registration and license plate valid for the
life of the trailer while the trailer is possessed by the registrant.
(2)  The owner must file, on or before January 31 of each year after the year
of issuance of the special registration and license plate, a certificate from
the assessing authority to the effect that any property tax or in lieu fee due
for the current year has been paid.
(3)  If property tax or the in lieu fee is not paid, registration is suspended
or revoked.
